Washington statutes.
RCW 4.22.030

Nature of liability.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 4.22.070, if more than one person is liable to a claimant on an indivisible claim for the same injury, death or harm, the liability of such persons shall be joint and several.

[ 1986 c 305 s 402; 1981 c 27 s 11.]

NOTES:

Preamble—Report to legislature—Applicability—Severability—1986 c 305: See notes following RCW 4.16.160.